District of Columbia statutes.
44-1202

Eligibility for treatment for substance abuse.

(a)

Each District resident who meets the requirements of this section shall be eligible for treatment for substance abuse at the treatment facility, regardless of his or her ability to pay, subject to the restriction in § 44-1208, if the resident:

(1)

Applies for treatment or is referred for treatment by a court of competent jurisdiction; and

(2)

Has been examined by a qualified health professional who has determined that the individual needs treatment for substance abuse in a nonhospital residential setting.

(b)

Any minor, pregnant woman, or the parent, guardian, or other person who has legal custody of a minor and who meets the requirements of this section shall have priority for admission to the treatment facility over any single adult who does not have a minor child.

(c)

The determination of an individual’s need for treatment may be made by a qualified health professional on duty at the treatment facility or by any other qualified health professional who has examined the individual prior to the individual’s application or referral for admission.

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 3, 36 DCR 8469
1981 Ed., § 32-1602.